Utah statutes.
78B-6-1230.   Protection of vested, contingent, or future rights.

In all cases of sales if it appears that any person has a vested, contingent, or future right or estate in any of the property sold, the court shall ascertain and settle the proportionate value of the contingent or vested right or estate, and direct the proportion of the proceeds of the sale to be invested, secured, or paid over in a manner that would protect the rights and interests of the parties.

